Illinois, session 104th, HB5283.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 45-45 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/45-45)7    Sec. 45-45. Small businesses. 8    (a) Set-asides. Each chief procurement officer has 9authority to designate as small business set-asides a fair 10proportion of construction, supply, and service contracts for 11award to small businesses in Illinois. Advertisements for bids 12or offers for those contracts shall specify designation as 13small business set-asides. In awarding the contracts, only 14bids or offers from qualified small businesses shall be 15considered.16    (b) Small business. "Small business" means a business that 17is independently owned and operated and that is not dominant 18in its field of operation. The chief procurement officer shall 19establish a detailed definition by rule, using in addition to 20the foregoing criteria other criteria, including the number of 21employees and the dollar volume of business. When computing 22the size status of a potential contractor, annual sales and 23receipts of the potential contractor and all of its affiliates   HB5283- 2 -LRB104 19985 HLH 33436 b1shall be included. The maximum number of employees and the 2maximum dollar volume that a small business may have under the 3rules promulgated by the chief procurement officer may vary 4from industry to industry to the extent necessary to reflect 5differing characteristics of those industries, subject to the 6following limitations:7        (1) No wholesale business is a small business if its 8    annual sales for its most recently completed fiscal year 9    exceed $13,000,000.10        (2) No retail business or business selling services is 11    a small business if its annual sales and receipts exceed 12    $8,000,000.13        (3) No manufacturing business is a small business if 14    it employs more than the number of persons set forth in the 15    small business size standard for its specific industry, as 16    established by the United States Small Business 17    Administration 250 persons.18        (4) No construction business is a small business if 19    its annual sales and receipts exceed the small business 20    size standard for its specific industry, as established by 21    the United States Small Business Administration 22    $14,000,000.23    (c) Fair proportion. For the purpose of subsection (a), 24for State agencies of the executive branch, a fair proportion 25of construction contracts shall be no less than 25% nor more 26than 40% of the annual total contracts for construction.  HB5283- 3 -LRB104 19985 HLH 33436 b1    (d) Withdrawal of designation. A small business set-aside 2designation may be withdrawn by the purchasing agency when 3deemed in the best interests of the State. Upon withdrawal, 4all bids or offers shall be rejected, and the bidders or 5offerors shall be notified of the reason for rejection. The 6contract shall then be awarded in accordance with this Code 7without the designation of small business set-aside. Each 8chief procurement officer shall make the annual report 9available on his or her official website. Each chief 10procurement officer shall also issue a press release in 11conjunction with the small business annual report that 12includes an executive summary of the annual report and a link 13to the annual report on the chief procurement officer's 14website.15    (e) Small business specialist. Each chief procurement 16officer shall designate one or more individuals to serve as 17its small business specialist. The small business specialists 18shall collectively work together to accomplish the following 19duties:20        (1) Compiling and maintaining a comprehensive list of 21    potential small contractors. In this duty, he or she shall 22    cooperate with the Federal Small Business Administration 23    in locating potential sources for various products and 24    services.25        (2) Assisting small businesses in complying with the 26    procedures for bidding on State contracts.  HB5283- 4 -LRB104 19985 HLH 33436 b1        (3) Examining requests from State agencies for the 2    purchase of property or services to help determine which 3    invitations to bid are to be designated small business 4    set-asides.5        (4) Making recommendations to the chief procurement 6    officer for the simplification of specifications and terms 7    in order to increase the opportunities for small business 8    participation.9        (5) Assisting in investigations by purchasing agencies 10    to determine the responsibility of bidders or offerors on 11    small business set-asides.12    (f) Small business annual report. Each small business 13specialist designated under subsection (e) shall annually 14before November 1 report in writing to the General Assembly 15concerning the awarding of contracts to small businesses. The 16report shall include the total value of awards made in the 17preceding fiscal year under the designation of small business 18set-aside. The report shall also include the total value of 19awards made to businesses owned by minorities, women, and 20persons with disabilities, as defined in the Business 21Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 22Disabilities Act, in the preceding fiscal year under the 23designation of small business set-aside.24    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 25shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 26by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act.  HB5283- 5 -LRB104 19985 HLH 33436 b1(Source: P.A. 103-570, eff. 1-1-24.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.